Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.055

Retention of property by secondhand dealers—Inspection.

(1) Property bought or received on consignment by any secondhand dealer with a permanent place of business in the state shall not be removed from that place of business except consigned property returned to the owner, within thirty days after the receipt of the property. Property shall at all times during the ordinary hours of business be open to inspection to any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions.

(2) Property bought or received on consignment by any secondhand dealer without a permanent place of business in the state, shall be held within the city or county in which the property was received, except consigned property returned to the owner, within thirty days after receipt of the property. The property shall be available within the appropriate jurisdiction for inspection at reasonable times by any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions.

(3) Property bought by any secondhand dealer through the use of an automated kiosk must be held for at least thirty days after the secondhand property was accepted by the automated kiosk. To satisfy this requirement the secondhand property may be held inside the automated kiosk or at a secure location maintained by the secondhand dealer. The secondhand property purchased through an automated kiosk must be made available to any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state, or any of its political subdivisions, for inspection within a reasonable time. The cost of transporting the secondhand property to the law enforcement officer must be paid by the secondhand dealer.

[ 2017 c 169 s 3; 1991 c 323 s 6; 1984 c 10 s 7.]

NOTES:

Auction of secondhand property, exemption by rule of department of licensing: RCW 18.11.075.